Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB889.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 196.026 is amended to read as follows:
The Department of Corrections shall consist of the following organizational units:
(1) Division of Compliance;
(2) Division of Public Affairs;
(3) Office of Adult Institutions, which shall have the following divisions:
(a) Division of Operations and Program Services;
(b) Division of Medical Services;
(c) Division of Mental Health Services;
(d) Division of Education;
(e) Division of Correctional Industries;
(f) Division of Kentucky State Reformatory;
(g) Division of Luther Luckett Correctional Complex;
(h) Division of Roederer Correctional Complex;
(i) Division of Blackburn Correctional Complex;
(j) Division of Kentucky Correctional Institution for Women;
(k) Division of Northpoint Training Center[ Division];
(l) Division of Eastern Kentucky Correctional Complex;
(m) Division of Bell County Forestry Camp;
(n) Division of Kentucky State Penitentiary;
(o) Division of Western Kentucky Correctional Complex;
(p) Division of Green River Correctional Complex;
(q) Division of Little Sandy Correctional Complex;[ and]
(r) Division of Southeast State Correctional Complex; and
(s) Division of Central Kentucky Medical Correctional Complex.
Page 1 of 2
BR252800.100 - 2528 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2528
Each division specified in paragraphs (f) to (s)[(r)] of this subsection shall be
headed by a warden pursuant to KRS 196.160;
(4) Office of Community Services and Facilities, which shall have the following
divisions:
(a) Division of Probation and Parole;
(b) Division of Reentry;
(c) Division of Local Facilities; and
(d) Division of Addiction Services; and
(5) Office of Support Services, which shall have the following divisions:
(a) Division of Administrative Services;
(b) Division of Corrections Training;
(c) Division of Population Management;
(d) Division of Offender Information Services; and
(e) Division of Parole Board Support.
Section 2. Whereas it is critical to ensure that the Department of Corrections is
able to provide the care and capacity necessary for the inmate population, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the
Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
BR252800.100 - 2528 - XXXX 3/20/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed